Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STUDIES; SUSTAINABLE AVIATION FUEL PRODUCTION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Carbon dioxide capture technology" means a process used to capture carbon dioxide emissions produced by an industrial facility before they are released to the atmosphere. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency. new text end new text begin (d) "Front-end engineering design study" means a study that estimates the cost of various portions of a project, evaluates potential risks, and establishes construction timelines, before a fixed-bid quote is developed. new text end new text begin (e) "Green hydrogen" has the meaning given in Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 12, section 76, paragraph (b), clause (3). new text end new text begin (f) "Jet fuel" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 296A.01, subdivision 8. new text end new text begin (g) "Metropolitan area" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (h) "Sustainable aviation fuel" means liquid fuel that is derived from gaseous carbon dioxide and green hydrogen and whose lifecycle greenhouse gas emissions are at least 50 percent less than those of petroleum-based aviation gasoline, aviation turbine fuel, and jet fuel, as determined by calculations using: new text end new text begin (1) the most recent version of Argonne National Laboratory's Greenhouse Gases, Regulated Emissions, and Energy Use in Technologies (GREET) model; or new text end new text begin (2) the lifecycle methodology for sustainable aviation fuels adopted by the International Civil Aviation Organization with the agreement of the United States, incorporating induced land use change values. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Carbon capture; wastewater sludge incineration. new text end new text begin No later than ...., the commissioner must contract with an entity with expertise in designing carbon dioxide capture technology to design infrastructure to capture carbon dioxide emissions resulting from the incineration of wastewater solids at the Metropolitan Water Resource Recovery Facility in St. Paul and to transport the carbon dioxide to a facility described in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Study; sustainable aviation fuel production. new text end new text begin No later than ...., the commissioner must contract with an entity with relevant expertise to conduct a front-end engineering design study for constructing a facility in the metropolitan area that is capable of combining the carbon dioxide captured from the Metropolitan Water Resource Recovery Facility in St. Paul, as described in subdivision 2, with green hydrogen generated on site to produce sustainable aviation fuel. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin No later than June 30, 2029, the commissioner must submit a written report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over transportation and environment on the results of the contracts required under this section, including, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the capital and operating costs of: new text end new text begin (i) installing the carbon dioxide capture technology designed under subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (ii) transporting captured carbon dioxide from the Metropolitan Water Resource Recovery Facility in St. Paul to the facility designed under subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (iii) producing green hydrogen at the facility designed under subdivision 3; and new text end new text begin (iv) producing sustainable aviation fuel at the facility designed under subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (2) the number of additional workers employed at each of the facilities described in clause (1); and new text end new text begin (3) an estimate of the amount of sustainable aviation fuel that could be produced annually and the proportion that the amount represents of current and future aviation fuel usage at the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for the purposes of completing the contracts and report required under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation and is available through June 30, 2029. The commissioner may use up to five percent of this appropriation for the reasonable costs of administering section 1. new text end